Massachusetts, session 194th, S468.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2 section 244 the following section: 
3  Section 245. Alzheimer’s Disease and Dementia Awareness and Data Collection 
4  1. The Department of Public Health, in partnership with the Executive Office of Aging 
5 and Independence, the Massachusetts Advisory Council on Alzheimer’s Disease and All Other 
6 Dementias, and any additional community stakeholders as determined by the department, shall 
7 develop a public awareness campaign on brain health, Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias, 
8 and incorporate the campaign into its existing, relevant public health outreach programs on an 
9 ongoing basis. The public awareness campaign shall: 
10  (a) educate health care providers on the importance of early detection and timely 
11 diagnosis of cognitive impairment, validated cognitive assessment tools, current and emerging 

2 of 16 12 treatment options, the value of a Medicare Annual Wellness visit for cognitive health, and the 
13 Medicare and Medicaid care planning billing codes for individuals with cognitive impairment;  
14  (b) increase public understanding and awareness of early warning signs of Alzheimer's 
15 disease and other types of dementia, the value of early detection and diagnosis, and how to 
16 reduce the risk of cognitive decline, particularly among persons in diverse communities who are 
17 at greater risk of developing Alzheimer's disease and other types of dementia; and  
18  (c) inform health care professionals and the general public of dementia care coordination 
19 services for those living with Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias and other resources and 
20 services available to individuals living with dementia and their families and caregivers. 
21  The department shall strive to provide uniform, consistent guidance on Alzheimer’s and 
22 other dementia in nonclinical terms, with an emphasis on cultural relevancy and health literacy, 
23 specifically targeting diverse populations who are at higher risk for developing dementia in its 
24 public awareness and educational outreach programs.  
25  2.  Not later than January 1, 2027, and biannually thereafter, the department shall report 
26 to the Joint Committee on Public Health as well as to the Massachusetts Advisory Council on 
27 Alzheimer’s Disease and All Other Dementias regarding the department's work on the Healthy 
28 Brain Initiative Road Map. As used in this section, "Healthy Brain Initiative Road Map" means 
29 the National Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's collaborative approach to fully 
30 integrate cognitive health into public health practice and reduce the risk and impact of 
31 Alzheimer's disease and other dementias. 
32  3. The Department of Public Health shall include the National Centers for Disease 
33 Control and Prevention's Healthy Aging Program’s module on Subjective Cognitive Decline or 

3 of 16 34 module on Caregiving in the annual Behavioral Risk Factor Surveillance System (BRFSS) 
35 survey on a rotating annual basis to collect prevalence data on Alzheimer’s and other dementias, 
36 track trends over time and analyze data to direct public health programs and resources. 
37  4. The Massachusetts State Health Assessment and any related data reports or tools shall 
38 include data on the racial and ethnic disparities for Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias 
39 where available, as well as data pertaining to cognitive decline and caregiving collected as part 
40 of the annual BRFSS survey. All resulting reports shall provide data in an aggregate and de-
41 identified format. 
42  SECTION 2. Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
43 section 16FF the following section: 
44  Section 16GG. Massachusetts Director of Dementia Care and Coordination 
45  1. There shall be a position titled Director of Dementia Care and Coordination within the 
46 Executive Office of Health and Human Services. The Secretary of Health and Human Services 
47 shall hire the director who shall report to the secretary or their designee. The director may call 
48 upon appropriate agencies of the state government for assistance as is needed. Duties and 
49 responsibilities of the director shall include, but not be limited to, the following:  
50  (a) Coordinate the successful implementation of the Alzheimer’s Disease State Plan. 
51  (b) Coordinate with relevant departments and the Chair of the Massachusetts Advisory 
52 Council on Alzheimer’s Disease and All Other Dementias to support the council’s work and 
53 annual updates to the Alzheimer’s state plan.   

4 of 16 54  (c) Coordinate with the Department of Public Health on awareness efforts as directed 
55 through section 245 of Chapter 111 of the Massachusetts General Laws; Facilitate and support 
56 coordination of outreach programs and services between agencies, area agencies on aging, aging 
57 services access points and other community organizations for the purpose of fostering public 
58 awareness and education regarding Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia.  
59  (d) Coordinate with relevant state agencies and community organizations to ensure 
60 coordination of services, access to services and a high quality of care for individuals with 
61 dementia and their family caregivers to meet the needs of the affected population and prevent 
62 duplication of services.  
63  (f) Assess dementia-related training requirements for any professionals required to 
64 receive dementia training including healthcare, long term care, first responders and home and 
65 community based services professionals on a biannual basis, including hours required, frequency 
66 of training required and content of training, to determine whether existing training requirements 
67 meet the needs of the dementia community in Massachusetts; the assessment shall also include 
68 whether trainings incorporate the latest recommendations from leading national voluntary or 
69 governmental health organizations in Alzheimer’s care, support and research to ensure trainings 
70 are based on expert opinion and include evidence-based curriculum that result in a high quality 
71 of care for people living with dementia. Upon completion of the assessment, provide 
72 recommendations to the Department of Public Health, the Executive Office of Aging and 
73 Independence, the Massachusetts Advisory Council on Alzheimer’s Disease and All Other 
74 Dementias, the Board of Registration in Nursing and the Board of Registration in Medicine and 
75 any other appropriate departments or boards for additional training necessary to adequately 
76 support the dementia community in Massachusetts.  

5 of 16 77  (g) Work with the Commissioner of the Department of Public Health, the Secretary of the 
78 Executive Office of Aging and Independence, the Board of Registration in Nursing, the Board of 
79 Registration in Medicine and any other appropriate departments or boards to ensure all 
80 professionals required to complete dementia training are in compliance.  
81  (h) Work with the Commissioner of the Department of Public Health to ensure that 
82 hospitals are dementia capable and in compliance with Chapter 220 of the Acts of 2018. 
83  (i) Identify and manage grants to assist Massachusetts in becoming dementia-capable.  
84  (j) Ensure collection and reporting of data related to the impact of Alzheimer's disease in 
85 the commonwealth; work with the department's Behavioral Risk Factor Surveillance System 
86 Coordinator in identifying available funds to execute appropriate modules for critical data 
87 collection and research; coordinate with the Department of Public Health to improve public 
88 health outcomes utilizing relevant dementia data. 
89  SECTION 3.  Chapter 118E of the general laws is hereby amended by adding the 
90 following new section: 
91  Section 83. Dementia Care Coordination Benefit for SCO & One Care Members 
92  As used in this section the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires 
93 otherwise, have the following meanings:- 
94  “Dementia Care Coordination”, a proactive care consultation service provided to 
95 individuals living with dementia and their caregiver. 
96  (b) To ensure that members of Senior Care Options (SCO) plans and One Care plans 
97 receive cost effective, quality dementia care, to lower other health care costs and provide support 

6 of 16 98 to caregivers, MassHealth shall require that all Massachusetts SCO plans and One Care plans 
99 include Dementia Care Coordination (DCC) services as a benefit to SCO and One Care members 
100 that have been diagnosed with Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias and their caregivers.  
101  DCC shall be initiated by a referral from the member’s care team. Upon referral, a patient 
102 with dementia and their caregiver or family member will receive a call from a trained care 
103 consultant, who shall provide care consultation services to the family, resulting in an 
104 individualized family care plan. A summary of the individualized family care plan shall be 
105 provided to the referring care team for inclusion in the health record. 
106  Individualized care plans may provide guidance on dementia caregiving strategies, 
107 including symptom management strategies, communication techniques, legal and financial 
108 issues, safety recommendations, and recommendations for appropriate community support 
109 services. 
110  (c) In order to meet the requirements of this Section, SCO and One Care plans may 
111 contract with community partners, or directly provide DCC services to their members. 
112  SECTION 4. Chapter 6 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by 
113 inserting the following section after Section 116K: 
114  Section 116L. Municipal police training committee; training program for appropriate 
115 interactions with persons living with Alzheimer’s or other dementias.  
116  The municipal police training committee shall identify or develop and implement a 
117 dementia training program for law enforcement officers, in consultation with the Executive 
118 Office of Aging and Independence, the Alzheimer’s Association Massachusetts Chapter, the 

7 of 16 119 Massachusetts Coalition of Police, Massachusetts Chiefs of Police Association, and the 
120 Massachusetts Police Association. The committee may also consult with other appropriate 
121 organizations and agencies having an interest and expertise in Alzheimer’s and other dementias, 
122 or those representing or working with first responders. The program must include instruction on 
123 the identification of people with Alzheimer’s and other dementias, risks such as wandering and 
124 elder abuse, and the best practices for interacting with them. 
125  All law enforcement officers shall complete at least two (2) hours of initial training 
126 within the recruit basic training curriculum. The program shall cover the following: 
127  Dementia and symptoms associated with dementia;  
128  Communication issues, including how to communicate respectfully and effectively with 
129 the individual who has dementia in order to determine the most appropriate response and 
130 effective communication techniques to enhance collaboration with caregivers;  
131  Techniques for understanding and approaching behavioral symptoms and identifying 
132 alternatives to physical restraints; 
133  Identifying and reporting incidents of abuse, neglect, and exploitation to the Executive 
134 Office of Aging and Independence Adult Protective Services; 
135  Protocols for contacting caregivers when a person with dementia is found wandering, or 
136 during emergency or crisis situations; and 
137  Local caregiving resources that are available for people living with dementia. 

8 of 16 138  All law enforcement officers shall complete at least one (1) hour of biannual in-service 
139 education covering the subjects described in subsections (a) through (f). The biannual in-service 
140 training shall qualify towards the minimum credit hours required for in-service education.  
141  SECTION 5. Chapter 22C of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by 
142 inserting the following section after Section 20: 
143  Section 20A. State Police training program for appropriate interactions with persons 
144 living with Alzheimer’s or other dementias.  
145  The Department of State Police shall identify or develop and implement a dementia 
146 training program for state police officers, in consultation with the Executive Office of Aging and 
147 Independence, the Alzheimer’s Association Massachusetts Chapter, and the State Police 
148 Association of Massachusetts. The department may also consult with other appropriate 
149 organizations and agencies having an interest and expertise in Alzheimer’s and other dementias, 
150 or those representing or working with first responders. The program must include instruction on 
151 the identification of people with Alzheimer’s and other dementias, risks such as wandering and 
152 elder abuse, and the best practices for interacting with them. 
153  All state police officers shall complete at least two (2) hours of initial training within the 
154 recruit basic training curriculum. The program shall cover the following: 
155  Dementia and symptoms associated with dementia;  
156  Communication issues, including how to communicate respectfully and effectively with 
157 the individual who has dementia in order to determine the most appropriate response and 
158 effective communication techniques to enhance collaboration with caregivers;  

9 of 16 159  Techniques for understanding and approaching behavioral symptoms and identifying 
160 alternatives to physical restraints; 
161  Identifying and reporting incidents of abuse, neglect, and exploitation to the Executive 
162 Office of Aging and Independence Adult Protective Services; 
163  Protocols for contacting caregivers when a person with dementia is found wandering, or 
164 during emergency or crisis situations; and 
165  Local caregiving resources that are available for people living with dementia. 
166  2. All state police officers shall complete at least one (1) hour of biannual in-service 
167 education covering the subjects described in subsections (a) through (f). The biannual in-service 
168 training shall qualify towards the minimum credit hours required for in-service education.  
169  SECTION 6. Chapter 6 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by 
170 inserting the following section after Section 164: 
171  Section 164A. Massachusetts fire training council; training program for appropriate 
172 interactions with persons living with Alzheimer’s or other dementias. 
173  The Massachusetts fire training council will identify or develop and implement a 
174 dementia training program for firefighters, in consultation with the Massachusetts fire service 
175 commission, the Executive Office of Aging and Independence, the Alzheimer's Association 
176 Massachusetts Chapter, the Professional Firefighters of Massachusetts and the Massachusetts 
177 Fire Chiefs Association. The council may also consult with other appropriate organizations and 
178 agencies having an interest and expertise in Alzheimer’s and other dementias, or those 
179 representing or working with first responders. The program must include instruction on the 

10 of 16 180 identification of people with Alzheimer’s and other dementias, risks such as wandering and elder 
181 abuse, and the best practices for interacting with them. 
182  All firefighters shall complete at least two (2) hours of initial training within the recruit 
183 basic training curriculum. The program shall cover the following: 
184  Dementia and symptoms associated with dementia;  
185  Communication issues, including how to communicate respectfully and effectively with 
186 the individual who has dementia in order to determine the most appropriate response and 
187 effective communication techniques to enhance collaboration with caregivers;  
188  Techniques for understanding and approaching behavioral symptoms and identifying 
189 alternatives to physical restraints; 
190  Identifying and reporting incidents of abuse, neglect, and exploitation to the Executive 
191 Office of Aging and Independence Adult Protective Services; 
192  Protocols for contacting caregivers when a person with dementia is found wandering, or 
193 during emergency or crisis situations; and 
194  Local caregiving resources that are available for people living with dementia. 
195  All firefighters shall complete at least one (1) hour of biannual in-service education 
196 covering the subjects described in subsections (a) through (f). The biannual in-service training 
197 shall qualify towards the minimum credit hours required for in-service education.  
198  SECTION 7. Chapter 111C of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by 
199 inserting the following section after Section 9A: 

11 of 16 200  Section 9B. EMS training program for appropriate interactions with persons living with 
201 Alzheimer’s or other dementias. 
202  The Department of Public Health will identify or develop and implement a dementia 
203 training program for EMS personnel, in consultation with the Executive Office of Aging and 
204 Independence, the Alzheimer's Association Massachusetts Chapter and the Massachusetts 
205 Ambulance Association. The department may also consult with other appropriate organizations 
206 and agencies having an interest and expertise in Alzheimer’s and other dementias, or those 
207 representing or working with first responders. The program must include instruction on the 
208 identification of people with Alzheimer’s and other dementias, risks such as wandering and elder 
209 abuse, and the best practices for interacting with them. 
210  1. All EMS personnel shall complete at least two (2) hours of initial training within the 
211 recruit basic training curriculum. The program shall cover the following: 
212  Dementia and symptoms associated with dementia;  
213  Communication issues, including how to communicate respectfully and effectively with 
214 the individual who has dementia in order to determine the most appropriate response and 
215 effective communication techniques to enhance collaboration with caregivers;  
216  Techniques for understanding and approaching behavioral symptoms and identify 
217 alternatives to physical restraints; 
218  Identifying and reporting incidents of abuse, neglect, and exploitation to the Executive 
219 Office of Aging and Independence Adult Protective Services; 

12 of 16 220  Protocols for contacting caregivers when a person with dementia is found wandering, or 
221 during emergency or crisis situations; and 
222  Local caregiving resources that are available for people living with dementia. 
223  2. All EMS personnel shall complete at least one (1) hour of biannual in-service 
224 education covering the subjects described in subsections (a) through (f). The biannual in-service 
225 training shall qualify towards the minimum credit hours required for in-service education.  
226  SECTION 8. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended in Section 25N (a) (2) 
227 by inserting after the words “obstetrics/gynecology”, the following words: 
228  “, geriatrics, geriatric psychiatry,” 
229  SECTION 9. Chapter 112 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended in 
230 Section 12G ½ by inserting the words “or other dementias” after each occurrence of the words 
231 “Alzheimer’s disease". 
232  SECTION 10. Section 8 of Chapter 220 of the Acts of 2018 is hereby amended by 
233 striking out the words “not later than October 1, 2021” and inserting in place thereof the 
234 following: “not later than July 1, 2027 and every 5 years thereafter”. 
235  Said section of Chapter 220 of the Acts of 2018 is further amended by striking out 
236 subsections (i) through (iii) and inserting in place thereof the following:  
237  (i) Complete an operational plan for the recognition and management of patients with 
238 dementia or delirium in acute-care settings. Upon completion of the operational plan, the plan 
239 shall be submitted to the Department of Public Health for approval. The department shall 
240 evaluate the plan and approve or offer amendments to the plan within 90 days of receipt. Once a 

13 of 16 241 final plan is approved by the Department of Public Health, the plan shall be implemented by the 
242 hospital.  
243  (ii) The operational plan shall include provisions on the following: (a) education and 
244 training of clinical and non-clinical staff; (b) providing a dementia and/or delirium appropriate 
245 environment; (c) recognition of dementia and/or delirium; (d) patient management and treatment, 
246 including how to manage symptoms, treatment protocols and side effect management; (e) 
247 transition planning to improve and provide safe admissions, transfers and discharges, including 
248 protocols to ensure that patients living with dementia are safe and have a staff member or 
249 caregiver present during discharge or transfer; (f) advance care planning information; (g) 
250 caregiver communication and coordination, including protocols to ensure that a contact to a 
251 caregiver has been attempted upon arrival and prior to discharge if patient agrees; and (h) 
252 address additional applicable recommendations made by the Alzheimer’s and related dementias 
253 acute care advisory committee established pursuant to chapter 228 of the acts of 2014 and any 
254 additional guidance issued by the Massachusetts Health & Hospital Association or the 
255 Department of Public Health;  
256  (ii) Each hospital’s operational plan shall be updated at least every five years, with the 
257 option to update the plan more frequently as needed;  
258  (iii) A copy of each hospital’s plan shall be provided to the Massachusetts Advisory 
259 Council on Alzheimer’s Disease and All Other Dementias upon approval;  
260  (v) An electronic copy of each hospital’s operational plan shall be provided to each 
261 employee upon approval and a written copy of the plan shall be provided to any of its employees 
262 upon request; and  

14 of 16 263  (vi) Each hospital shall keep a copy of the plan on file and make available for review by 
264 the public. 
265  SECTION 11. Chapter 111 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by 
266 inserting the following section after Section 53H: 
267  Section 53I. Alzheimer’s and Dementia Patient and Caregiver Rights in Acute Care 
268 Settings; Safe Discharge for Alzheimer’s and Dementia Patients 
269  The department shall require acute care hospitals to allow a family member or other 
270 caregiver for patients with Alzheimer’s or other dementias, or for patients exhibiting symptoms 
271 of dementia or cognitive impairment, to remain with the patient at all times that are medically 
272 appropriate, including, but not limited to, while in the emergency department and while admitted 
273 as an inpatient. Caregivers for patients living with Alzheimer’s or other dementias shall not be 
274 required to adhere to restricted hospital visiting hours, unless it has been deemed unsafe for the 
275 patient, family member or caregiver. 
276  The department shall require acute care hospitals to create policies and protocols to 
277 ensure that a family member, a caregiver, or the personal legal representative responsible for a 
278 patient with Alzheimer’s or other dementia is contacted as soon as possible following admission 
279 to the emergency department or hospital if the patient presents to the hospital without a family 
280 member, a caregiver, or a personal legal representative; provided, however, that the hospital shall 
281 only contact a family member, a caregiver, or the personal legal representative if (i) the hospital 
282 has received consent from the patient if possible to do so; and (ii) to the extent consistent with 
283 federal and state law or regulation, and in the reasonable judgment of the hospital. If the patient 
284 is incapacitated or not able to provide consent, a health care provider may share the patient’s 

15 of 16 285 information with a family member, a caregiver, or the personal legal representative responsible 
286 for a patient with Alzheimer’s or other dementia as long as the health care provider determines, 
287 based on professional judgment, that it is in the best interest of the patient.  
288  The department shall require acute care hospitals to create policies and protocols to 
289 ensure that a family member, a caregiver, or the personal legal representative responsible for a 
290 patient living with Alzheimer’s or other dementia is contacted prior to the patient’s discharge to 
291 ensure a safe discharge, including suitable transport from the hospital, and review the discharge 
292 plan; provided, however, that the hospital shall only contact a family member, a caregiver, or the 
293 personal legal representative if (i) the hospital has received consent from the patient if possible to 
294 do so; and (ii) to the extent consistent with federal and state law or regulation, and in the 
295 reasonable judgment of the hospital. If the patient is incapacitated or not able to provide consent, 
296 a health care provider may contact a family member, a caregiver, or the personal legal 
297 representative responsible for the patient with Alzheimer’s or other dementia as long as the 
298 health care provider determines, based on professional judgment, that it is in the best interest of 
299 the patient. If a family member, caregiver or personal legal representative is not able to be 
300 contacted or if the patient declines contact, the patient living with Alzheimer’s or other dementia 
301 shall meet with a hospital social worker or other professional who can assess for discharge safety 
302 and other supports needed prior to discharge. 
303  Subsections (a) through (c) shall also apply to a patient who presents with symptoms of 
304 dementia or cognitive impairment based on the assessment of the physician overseeing their care 
305 in the hospital. 

16 of 16 306  Subsections (a) through (d) shall be exempted during a declared public health state of 
307 emergency. 
308  The department shall promulgate regulations consistent with the provisions of 
309 subsections (a) through (e). The department shall also ensure that subsections (a) through (d) 
310 comply with all state and federal privacy requirements, including those imposed by 45 C.F.R. § 
311 164.510(b).